Colorado statutes. TITLE 27 Behavioral Health
ARTICLE 60
GENERAL PROVISIONS

Section

PART 1 GENERAL PROVISIONS

PART 2 BEHAVIORAL HEALTH
ADMINISTRATION

PART 3 BEHAVIORAL HEALTH-CARE PROVIDER WORKFORCE

PART 4 EARLY INTERVENTION, DEFLECTION, AND REDIRECTION
FROM THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE SYSTEM GRANT PROGRAM

PART 5 COMMUNITY BEHAVIORAL HEALTH-CARE
CONTINUUM GAP GRANT PROGRAM